_	Through investigations and excavations, Dairoku came to the conviction that the family of Japanese emperors originated in this area.
_	The assailant, in a letter found upon him, stated as his motive the conviction that William was unapt of the task of uniting Germany.
_	It was born under the name of the- City Orchestra of Málaga, an association between the Málaga Town Council and the Regional Government of Andalusia, and responded to the conviction that a city such as Málaga ought to have a great symphony orchestra of its own.
_	Hind held the conviction that the mission to China must become the Church in China.
_	The officer said "a large proportion of senior officers," share "the conviction that the United States was an accomplice in the attack" (launched on by the Colombian military on a FARC camp in Ecuador, near the Colombian border).
_	From a letter from 1839: * "with the conviction that, if I dedicated time and mental effort completely the business my fortune would amount to probably now the double, I work much in general affairs.
_	I determined to take your life from the conviction that I should thereby render the highest service to my country and to Europe.’
_	According to Crick, the experience of learning physics had taught him something important—hubris—and the conviction that since physics was already a success, great advances should also be possible in other sciences such as biology.
_	The work of the Friends of Nature rests on the conviction that people's opportunities of personal development are inextricably linked with the protection of nature and the conservation of natural resources.
_	Returning to Moscow, Israilov met with other Chechen and Ingush students, including Abdurakhman Avtorkhanov and his elder brother Hussein, and they came to the conviction that a continuation of Soviet policy toward Chechen and Ingush Autonomous Oblasts would inevitably lead to popular uprisings.
_	But Haywood took away from this experience the conviction that labor needed more, not less, industrial unionism.
_	Blind faith, youthful commitment and a tenacious belief in new writing: above all, perhaps, the conviction that new work deserves the highest standards in acting, direction and design," The Guardian.
_	The reasoning behind that was based on the conviction that native born Indo officials should be easily able to adhere to lower living standards than expatriate Dutch officials born in the Netherlands.
_	The "Times" noted that the debate was an updated version of the nature or nurture argument that had simmered ever since Darwin's time: "The assertion that man's body is a biological machine, subject to biological rules, has never completely shaken the conviction that the human intellect and human behavior are unique, the subject of free will."
_	The U.S. State Department issued a bulletin on 18 October 1953, expressing its ""deepest sympathy for the families of those who lost their lives"" in Qibya as well as the conviction that those responsible ""should be brought to account and that effective measures should be taken to prevent such incidents in the future.""
_	Cultural pessimism arises with the conviction that the culture of a nation, a civilization, or humanity itself is in a process of irreversible decline.
_	His work was done without filters because his background as a photojournalist and his life philosophy had led him to the conviction that his job was to produce images and let the viewer bring to that experience the interpretation.
_	On the occasion of the 2015 pro-life march in Germany, he publicly stated: “As Christians we share the conviction that the inviolable dignity of every human being has its origin in God, the Creator of all life.
_	Implicit in his comments was the conviction that this conservatism was a direct result of colonialism and the dulled appetite for sublimity.
_	Hen’s general approach is based on the conviction that the roots of later medieval developments, and especially of the so-called Carolingian Renaissance, are to be sought in the centuries immediately succeeding the period of Roman rule.
_	It holds the conviction that “better scientific knowledge of the animals and their environment is essential to ensure efficient protection measures”.
_	As F. J. Harvey Darton, an early scholar of children's literature, explains, they "have the same ideal, in one aspect held by Rousseau, in another wholly rejected by him: the belief that a child should steadily contemplate Nature, and the conviction that by so doing he will be led to contemplate the traditional God".
_	Johann Karl August Musäus published a popular collection of tales between 1782 and 1787; the Grimms aided the revival with their folklore collection, built on the conviction that a national identity could be found in popular culture and with the common folk (").
_	His work is inspired by the conviction that loneliness and the feeling of being unloved are the greatest poverties.
_	These women, the historian Thomas Dublin observes, felt “no deference toward their employers,” expressing the conviction that they “were the social equals of their overseers, indeed of the millowners themselves.”
_	We must be guided by the conviction that every person is created in the image of God."
_	Some soldiers and officers in the Polish eastern territories shared the conviction that Jews were enemies of the Polish nation-state and were collaborators with Poland's enemies.
_	This work led him to the conviction that the best way to understand the complexity of living systems was through studying the shape of the giant macromolecules from which they are made - an approach which he popularised with passion as ‘molecular biology’.
_	This friendship is bound by the conviction that whatever the circumstances that may befall should be faced boldly and jointly.
_	Equally at ease with landscape, portraits, still-life and figures, Horace has worked in the conviction that the age of great painting continues in our time.
_	It expresses the conviction that God is just in his actions, even when they are seemingly negative in human eyes.
_	This was the conviction that led the Sisters of Mercy, a community of Roman Catholic nuns, to establish St. Joseph’s Mercy High School in 1897, three years after they launched their mission in Guyana.
_	Peukert wrote:"From the 1890s...the conviction that social reform was necessary was increasingly outflanked and overtaken by the belief that all social problems could find their rational solution through state intervention and scientific endeavor...
_	As the historian Gwendolyn Wright puts it, "the Islamic sense of history and architecture found the concept of setting off monuments entirely foreign", which "gave the French proof of the conviction that only they could fully appreciate the Moroccan past and its beauty."
_	Camp Rising Sun's reputation was built on the conviction that there is much to be learned through experience and interaction with those from other cultures and nations.
_	Meksi's work was important for the development of written Albanian, and his endeavors strengthened the conviction that a stable Albanian alphabet had to be created.
_	It abolished the conception of life as an entity above and beyond the common properties of matter, and led to the conviction that the marvellous and exceptional qualities of that which we call living matter are nothing more nor less than an exceptionally complicated development of those chemical and physical properties which we recognize in a gradually ascending scale of evolution in the carbon compounds, containing nitrogen as well as oxygen, sulphur and hydrogen as constituent atoms of their enormous molecules.
_	What unites this alliance of convenience is a shared vision of American destiny and the conviction that American force and a tough Israeli line on the Arabs are the best ways to make the United States strong, Israel safe and the world a better place.
_	Unlike Werth, who supported the German offensive in Russia, Szombathelyi held the conviction that Hungarian troops should be employed only for the defense of Hungarian frontiers.
_	"Beliefs include the conviction that there are deep and hidden things about an individual that only diviners, priests, and other qualified persons can unravel.
_	Breaking with the federation's strictly Christian ideology of the past, the newly adopted Declaration of Principles stated it would henceforth be guided by "either a spiritual concept based on the conviction that man and universe are created by God, or other concepts that lead together with it to a common effort to build a human community united in freedom, dignity, justice and brotherhood."
_	Professor Wilson wrote, "I have come to the conviction that no man knows enough to attack the veracity of the Old Testament.
_	Walker was moved by the conviction that "much of the opposition to ritual" in the Anglican Church was "due to a mistaken or inadequate view of its meaning and intention."
_	Sharing the conviction that languages are the key to our cultural and spiritual heritage, these scholars sensed a need for change in the way ancient languages have been taught since the 19th century.
_	In fact the object of meditation for taking and giving is great joy: "We develop the conviction that we have destroyed our self-cherishing mind and purified our negative karma, and then generate joy.
_	Her quiet, modest confidence, confidence evidently born of knowledge, cannot fail to beget the conviction that the choice which placed the reins of government in this important position in her hands and that she will maintain the dignity and prestige which the Service has acquired during the tenure of office of the present Matron-in-Chief Miss Sidney Browne, R.R.C.
_	From the time of his discovery of Eagle Pass, he formed the conviction that this was the best route for the railway.
_	It is a part of male abstract expressionism the conviction that painting is a fragment of a more complex state.
_	The Upanishad, in Chapter 3, continues the sermon of Vishnu to Ribhu, that "Ribhu should develop the conviction that he himself is palpable Existence and Consciousness, indivisible, without a counterpart, devoid of all visibility, non-ailing, flawless, the Shiva without a double".
_	Key to the realist belief is the conviction that power must be defined in military terms.
_	He expressed the conviction that the social and economic reasons why people have an artefact or a building or used, are an important part of the study.
_	Affirming the conviction that the States in the Black Sea Region should continue to uphold their responsibility for maintaining peace, stability, prosperity and good neighbourly relations in the Black Sea area, by utilizing effectively and efficiently all available organisations (BSEC), initiatives and processes in the area, contributing to democratic transformation and sustainable development;
_	The idea of forming this radio station was born out of the conviction that the station would stimulate and guide the communities to action.
_	Officially, its stated purpose is to "be a project based upon the conviction that understanding is essential to peace and that such understanding can be best realized through personal friendship and mutual respect which such friendship engenders."
_	CIMA's mission is based on the conviction that free and independent media play an indispensable role in developing sustainable democracies around the world.
_	"Alexis Okeowo, who was named a staff writer in late 2015, is continuing the tradition of the foreign correspondent who takes considerable personal risks driven by the conviction that all stories deserve to be told, particularly those that require a great deal of courage to uncover in the first place."
_	Moustafa believes in the importance of respecting the personal space of one's understanding and practising of religion, as a Muslim Moustafa has the conviction that Kemal Atatürk model in Turkey post WW1 is probably the best political framework for the Arab World to adopt for modernity and social-political reform.
_	During this period as a clandestine missionary in England he formed the conviction that the people were not set against Rome by choice, but by force and by circumstances; and the majority were only too ready, in response to his sermons and ministrations, to return to Roman Catholicism.
_	The International Doctorate in Translation Studies seeks to promote doctoral programs all over the world based on the conviction that they are a major means of advancing scholarship in the discipline.
_	According to landscape theorist Anita Berrizbeitia, in her introduction to a book of essays on the work of MVVA, "His parks and public open spaces are based on the conviction that not only can the power of nature and the power of the man-made coexist, but they are the better for doing so."
_	The Florida property bubble of the 1920s established the mood "and the conviction that God intended the American middle classes to be rich," a sentiment so strong that it survived the ensuing crash of property prices.
_	A united party of the left, formed out of the conviction that back in 1933 the Nazi Party had been able to take power because of divisions of the political left, the SED soon became the ruling party in a new kind of German one-party dictatorship.
_	His personal involvement with previous battles lead him to the conviction that Wellington will not lose, so rather than take his father-in-law's advice to sell his funds he gambles on victory.
_	Similarly, The Earl of Clare, the Lord Chancellor of Ireland, wrote to the Privy Council in June 1798, "In the North nothing will keep the rebels quiet but the conviction that where treason has broken out the rebellion is merely popish", expressing the hope that the Presbyterian republicans might not rise if they thought that rebellion was supported only by Catholics.
_	Those who still fought against Charles did so with the full determination to ensure the triumph of their cause, and with the conviction that the only possible way was the annihilation of the enemy's armed forces.
_	In his original Statement of Donor, Olmsted noted, "Fundamental to the initial purpose of creating the scholarship program is the conviction that the greatest leaders must be educated broadly."
_	"For all the conviction that Lang brings to Turn Around, the album began almost as an afterthought.
_	He argues that Germans began the War in the conviction that they were fighting, "a war of national defense forced upon them by Allied machinations and Polish aggression," and that Allied bombing of Germany convinced them of their own victimhood, mixed with guilt over their treatment of Jews, Ukrainians, Poles and others.
_	The practice of restrictive marriages has been noted as increasing over the years until the 20th century: the passage of time strengthened the conviction that royalty only allied with royalty, and from the 16th century marriages between royalty and commoner became rarer and rarer.
_	During the course of his life, Owen develops the conviction that he is "God's instrument".
_	These men shared the conviction that the existing American labor unions were unable to achieve real benefits for the workers.
_	In them Maykov professed a belief in spiritual humility and expressed the conviction that this particular feature of the Russian national character would be its saving grace.
_	impossible to escape the conviction that Chap.
_	The new approach proceeds from the conviction that development cannot be sustainable unless disaster mitigation is built into the development process.
_	It established with certainty the conviction that the accession to the caliphal office (khilafah) by these early elders of Islam was one of the cardinal principles of religion.
_	by the conviction that Henry Thoreau had
_	While he did not abandon the hope of Jewish national gathering, he held to the conviction that the Jewish hope lay only with the help of “our brother Jesus”:
_	He allegedly told her that he was of the conviction that as long as a nation does what is best for its own interests and succeeds, the world admires it.
_	Media democracy entails that media should be used to promote democracy as well as the conviction that media should be democratic itself; media ownership concentration is not democratic and cannot serve to promote democracy and therefore must be examined critically.
_	The U.S. Congressional International Conservation Caucus, founded in September 2003, is a bipartisan congressional organization with the conviction that “the United States of America has the opportunity, the obligation and the interests to advance the conservation of natural resources for this and future generations,” and a commitment to promote U.S. leadership in public/private conservation partnerships worldwide.
_	As may be witnessed even into the Christian era, not least by the complaints of various philosophers over popular beliefs, many or perhaps most traditional Greeks maintained the conviction that certain individuals were resurrected from the dead and made physically immortal and that others could only look forward to an existence as disembodied and dead, though everlasting, souls.
_	In reflecting on their estimation skills or techniques, about half the subjects went through all seven problems without once letting go of the conviction that calculators are infallible.
_	Demaría's study of philosophy led him to the conviction that man's deepest conscience responds to sentiment and feeling rather than to ideas and rationality.
_	In the article it states, "The operation here reported and the studies leading thereto were undertaken with the conviction that even though the structure of the heart was grossly abnormal, in many instances it might be possible to alter the course of the circulation in such a manner as to lessen the 'cyanosis' and the resultant disability."
_	The ceremony, to which the place and the hour gave an additional solemnity, was characterized throughout by that extreme dignity and punctiliousness which are the distinctive marks of the proceedings of Japanese gentlemen of rank; and it is important to note this fact, because it carries with it the conviction that the dead man was indeed the officer who had committed the crime, and no substitute.
_	In his desire to attain the charm of the colours of the great Venetians, a very faded picture of that school led him to the conviction that they painted their pictures entirely in grey before putting on the bright colours.
_	To implement the decision of the Conference of the Parties of CMS to list the ruddy-headed goose ("Chloephaga rubidiceps") on Appendix I and II of the Convention as a consequence of its endangered status and the conviction that conservation efforts of this species are dependent on collaboration between the two range States, an Article IV agreement was concluded and entered into effect on 21 November 2006.
_	After two years, however, he quit school in the conviction that he should learn a trade and join the proletariat.
_	It was not thus, however, that the question was to be settled; and he returned from London, wondering what would be the result, but comforting himself with the conviction that an over-ruling wisdom predominated over earthly counsels, and that all would be controlled for the best.
_	Other objections can stem from a deep sense of responsibility toward humanity as a whole, or from the conviction that even acceptance of work under military orders acknowledges the principle of conscription that should be everywhere condemned before the world can ever become safe for real democracy.
_	Amelia, mother and wife, Muriel, an ex-secretary and examiner, Luis Herney, ex-convict, Germán, a boy peasant recently arrived, Faber and Ingrid, two tolimenses who dream of setting up their own restaurant and Doña Pilar, a woman of almost 70 years; Will meet each night in a classroom with the conviction that it is never too late to start over.
_	Some of these include the identification of Wesley as a “folk theologian,” the conviction that Wesley can be seen as a theological mentor for contemporary Christian practice, the conviction that Wesley’s theology bears strong resembles to the Eastern Christian tradition, and the methodological construct known as Outler’s Quadrilateral.
_	With Dewey, he shares the conviction that philosophy should never exceed "natural" bounds.
_	In a review of Herbert Leibowitz's biography of William Carlos Williams, ""Something Urgent I Have to Say to You": The Life and Works of William Carlos Williams", book critic Christopher Benfey wrote of Williams's poetry: "Early and late, Williams held the conviction that poetry was, in his friend Kenneth Burke's phrase, 'equipment for living, a necessary guide amid the bewilderments of life.'
_	The standpoint that come out of this ideology is constructed upon the conviction that every human being must have the right to;
_	He observed, "I am not accusing the Government of having suborned those Surrey typists, but the Government could not have wished for a better reinforcement for their campaign to instil into the people of Britain the conviction that it is all their own fault".
_	Always strongly anticommunist, Taylor argued for land reform and community development in the conviction that the concentration of vast landholdings in a few hands and the severe exploitation of farm labor made the development of democracy impossible and made communist popularity grow.
_	Kierkegaard's father lived with the conviction that God would punish him by taking away their children prematurely for a sin he had committed.
_	There was a large media coverage, and the conviction that it would be a rough match.
_	This doctrine led him to the conviction that "world and organism are one in kind, and do not stand merely in harmony with each other."
_	The French authorities acquired the conviction that to deal with this uprising, intensified its military presence was necessary.
_	The consistent ethic's opposition to capital punishment is rooted in the conviction that an atmosphere of respect for life must pervade a society, and resorting to the death penalty does not support this attitude.
_	These were, "First, the conviction that our economy is healthy.
_	I instilled in him the conviction that art should reflect the new, mechanized world, and be accessible to the average person.
_	Constraints can be psychological, such as low self-efficacy; self-efficacy is the conviction that one is capable of executing a behavior required to produce certain outcomes (Witte & Allen, 2000).
_	This exposed him to various contemporary medical theories about human sexuality and Chidley formed the conviction that "there was something profoundly wrong with the way in which modern people had sex".
_	As long as Rommel and Lucie never had children she held on to the conviction that he would return to her.
_	Much interest is attached to games, with the conviction that proper physical culture is not only a source of pleasure and an auxiliary to health, but is a stimulus to the intellect.
_	In Bill’s words, Al Jackson and Mike Ryan had over the years “come around to the conviction that it was probably a meteor or a comet”.
_	In fact, the Convention as a whole rests upon the unanimous rejection of this phenomenon of illegal child removals and upon the conviction that the best way to combat them at an international level is to refuse to grant them legal recognition.
_	Following this victory WAGBI appointed its first full-time director, a former naval officer and Liverpool businessman, Commander John Anderton, who summed up his agenda as "doing one’s best for something one likes – backed by the conviction that what one is doing is right."
_	He succeeded in helping several of these children on the road to success, and in the process he acquired the conviction that his country was in need of profound change.
_	One of the most persistent views about the homosexual people in inter-war Latvia is expressed in the conviction that mostly representatives of artistic professions, especially ballet dancers and actors, are homosexual.
_	The seemingly preposterous exchanges and occurrences within these pages leave the reader with the conviction that Hank Chinaski's life was truly stranger than fiction.
_	"The most important principles of humanitarian action are humanity, neutrality, independence and impartiality, which posits the conviction that all people have equal dignity by virtue of their being human based solely on need, without discrimination among recipients.
_	He came to the conviction that Athos was the place of its origin, not Alexandria.
_	Having the "greatest reverence for Works of Art and Books", Hick's intention was to establish a Public Picture Gallery in Bolton, with "the conviction that such Works of Art would tend to greatly improve the taste and cultivate the better feeling of the rising generation".
_	Cynicism is one of the inevitable offshoots of alienation, resulting in the conviction that things will go wrong, that harm is to be expected.
_	In it, he expressed the conviction that all, without exception, are called to be saints, and that through Christian faith, all have the means necessary.
_	He fell dangerously ill with gastric or typhoid fever at Leonforte, but recovered, with the conviction that God still had work for him to do in England.
_	Hinduism holds vegetarianism as an ideal for three reasons: the principle of nonviolence (ahimsa) applied to animals; the intention to offer only "pure" (vegetarian) or sattvic food to a deity and then to receive it back as prasad; and the conviction that an insentient diet is beneficial for a healthy body and mind and that non-vegetarian food is detrimental for the mind and for spiritual development.
_	Towards the end of his life he adopted the view that the elements have been formed by some process of condensation from one primordial substance of extremely small atomic weight, and he expressed the conviction that atomic weights within narrow limits are variable and modified according to the physical conditions in which a compound is formed.
_	A pacifist committed to communist ideals, Burdekin abandoned pacifism in 1938 out of the conviction that fascism had to be fought.
_	CIMA's mission is based on the conviction that free and independent media play an indispensable role in developing sustainable democracies around the world.
_	One morning she awoke with the conviction that a center for the poor was needed in Du Page County that would not only feed their bodies but also their spirits.
_	According to Ian Hacking, "He had early acquired the conviction that one should publish only when one got something absolutely right, so he left very little in print."
_	At the root of his social thought is the conviction that the world is made and imagined.
_	Part of this popularity was due to the conviction that the name was originally the warcry of the arcángel, in his defeat of Satan!
_	Petrarch’s position, expressed both strongly and amusingly in his invective "On His Own Ignorance and That of Many Others" ("De sui ipsius ac multorum ignorantia") is also important for another reason: it represents the conviction that philosophy should let itself be guided by rhetoric, that the purpose of philosophy is therefore not so much to reveal the truth, but to encourage people to pursue the good.
_	Following the offensive, the RSK authorities reported fear and panic among the population caused by the conviction that the RSK could not defend itself against the HV.
_	GD responds to the marginalization of dialogue, negotiation, and collaboration as tools of international relations and arises from the conviction that while diplomacy matters today more than ever, it is in crisis and has been sidelined as a result of the militarization of international policy which has been carried forward from the Cold War to the Global War on Terror.
_	Blake thus led Frye to the conviction that the Bible provided Western societies with the mythology which informed all of Western literature.
_	The jury said that they placed the novel on the shortlist "with the conviction that those who stick with it will find it much less difficult than it first seems."
_	If the Examining Division reaches the conviction that the European patent application satisfies all the requirements of the EPC so that a European patent may be granted, it issues a communication under .
_	"Conflict means … the perceived differences of interests or the conviction that the actual aspirations of the parties can no be received at the same time."
_	The strong influence of his devout parents, his "great love for the writings of the Puritans", hints of Christian friends and especially his own studies of the Scriptures in Hebrew and Greek gradually led him to the conviction that many customs, traditions and teachings amongst the Christians of his time were not to be found in the Bible, but originated from man.
_	A spiritual crisis during this period—as he described two decades later in what is probably his best-known recorded teaching, "Ten Shekels and a Shirt"—left Reidhead with the conviction that much of evangelicalism had adopted utilitarian and humanistic philosophies contradictory to Biblical teaching.
_	Few details have survived of his childhood and youth, other than that as a child he had developed the conviction that he wanted to go to Italy because that was where the best Christians were to be found.
_	In PCT the process of self-actualization is what does the healing, and the therapist must remain non-directive and "sustain the conviction that each person is attempting to actualize himself: do not try to change anyone".
_	The open cabbage at the top is comparatively small: "the size of the cabbages at the top was so infinitesimal that one seemed forced to the conviction that nature meant them to be stalks, not cabbages".
_	Some translations have been motivated by a strong theological distinctive, such as the conviction that God's name be preserved in a Semitic form, seen in Sacred Name Bibles.
_	That is, there is no necessary connection between the conviction that X is wrong and the motivational drive not to do X.
_	Second, they share the conviction that small scale agroecological practices actually have higher efficiency, resilience to climate change, and increased food security and sovereignty.
_	Boyd notes the conviction that Topher and DeWitt have.
_	"The great concern of the liberal spirit" he told the guests, "rests at last upon the conviction that at almost any cost men must keep open the channels of understanding and preserve unclouded, lucid and serene their perceptiveness of truth."
_	The dominant strain in the soteriological writings of the Greek Fathers, such as Athanasius of Alexandria, was the so-called "physical" theory that Christ, by becoming man, restored the divine image in us; but blended with this is the conviction that his death was necessary to release us from the curse of sin, and that he offered himself in sacrifice for us.
_	These first parents and staff members held to the conviction that parents have been given the responsibility by God to teach and train their children.
_	"A Plea for Excuses" is both a demonstration by example, and a defense of the methods of ordinary language philosophy, which proceeds on the conviction that:
_	According to the "Washington Post", the Institute's plan is "firmly rooted in the conviction that more government can solve most of America's economic challenges.
_	Much of the legend and symbolism of modern Polish patriotism derives from this period, including the conviction that Polish independence is a necessary element of a just and legitimate European order.
_	For the last thirty years of his life he was possessed of the conviction that he should be the leader of the children of Israel to rebuild the city of Jerusalem.
_	Yoder claims that the church thus lives in the conviction that God calls Christians to imitate the way of Christ in his absolute obedience, even if it leads to their deaths, for they, too, will finally be vindicated in resurrection.
_	The British were under the conviction that all Indian traditions were based on texts and ignored the tradition's customary significance.
_	It is a portrayal of an obsessive fascination for the other, the conviction that the astroturf is greener on the other side, that comes through.
_	The foundation of Paul's political philosophy is the conviction that "the proper role for government in America is to provide national defense, a court system for civil disputes, a criminal justice system for acts of force and fraud, and little else."
_	This partly in the conviction that his former wife as an employee of the HypoVereinsbank into a complex system of black money shift was involved.
_	Yet, in our diversity and plurality of orientations, inspired by mutual respect and the spirit of solidarity, we share the conviction that another world is possible."
_	Key to the group’s support for technology was the conviction that it should neither replace humans in the workplace nor harm the environment.
_	They tried to harmonize the sources in the conviction that for every legal question only one binding rule exists.
_	He shared with Chłopicki the conviction that war with Russia was futile, but with the opening of hostilities took command of a corps and fought creditably at Grochov.
_	The instructions to centralize the cult sprang from the conviction that the cult in the different country shrines could no longer be reincorporated into the ordinances of a pure faith in God.
_	Although work in the field of health was conducted out of the conviction that western medicine was good for Africans, it was not an entirely altruistic programme.
_	A primary motivation for paraconsistent logic is the conviction that it ought to be possible to reason with inconsistent information in a controlled and discriminating way.
_	As Robert Leroux argued, Bastiat had the conviction that Proudhon's anti-interest doctrine "was the complete antithesis of any serious approach".
_	But watching this 1978 film again recently, I was struck more than ever with the conviction that this is the story of a teenage girl, told by her, and its subject is the way that hope and cheer have been beaten down in her heart.
_	As a specific example, all doctors and virologists agree that poliovirus causes paralysis in just a few infected subjects, and the success of the polio vaccine in preventing disease supports the conviction that the poliovirus is the causative agent.
_	"The realization that a terrible injustice was being done to women and the conviction that it was necessary to change the situation to provide help for those who needed it," replies the retired physician via email."
_	This is based on the conviction that the application of the model within a new context must be done each time anew to remain sensitive to the particularities of each case.
_	Heusaff stated in 1970: "From 1938 onwards I shared the conviction that Brittany could never regain her freedom "by consent"; the French state would use all its strength to prevent that ever happening.
_	Earlier, in 1902, James Allen published "As a Man Thinketh", which proceeds from the conviction that "a man is literally what he thinks, his character being the complete sum of all his thoughts."
_	According to Rachel Held Evans, it is driven by the conviction that "the virtuous woman serves primarily from the home as a submissive wife, diligent homemaker, and loving mother."
_	"We cannot resist the conviction that these parents have been living largely upon the earnings of these children, which amount from $125 to $150 per month.
_	The latter is the conviction that every student has the right to achieve and realise their own potential in what they do.
_	The workshops were developed with the conviction that the stability and quality of role models are more important than the gender.
_	The parents paid thirty marks for their son's admission; he expresses the conviction that they imposed this exile upon him from an earnest desire for his welfare.
_	Prajwala holds the conviction that sex trafficking is the worst form of human rights violation and flesh trade the oldest form of sexual slavery.
_	With the conviction that "handing out contraceptives was not enough," Calderone quit her position at Planned Parenthood in 1964 and established the Sex Information and Education Council of the United States, Inc. (SIECUS).
_	This work led him to the conviction that the system was essentially incomplete; in particular it lacked a simple method to allow the ideas to develop naturally into behaviour and experience.
_	It was founded by North Carolina minister James Archibald Campbell, under the conviction that no student should be denied admission because of lack of funds.
_	On 28 February 1944, she presented the idea of Operation Suicide to Hitler at Berchtesgaden, which "would require men who were ready to sacrifice themselves in the conviction that only by this means could their country be saved."
_	Several letters passed privately between them on the subject, and Bulstrode, in the conviction that he had the best of the argument, published in 1717—several years afterwards—"Letters between Dr. Wood, a Roman catholic, the Pretender's physician, and Whitelocke Bulstrode, Esq., a Member of the Church of England, touching the True Church, and whether there is Salvation out of the Roman Communion".
_	Webb surmises that the success of the American colonists in fighting against regular troops, led him in later years to the conviction that his countrymen in Ireland could cope with them with a similar result.
_	Gen. Matthew Ridgway later recalled that York "created in the minds of farm boys and clerks ... the conviction that an aggressive soldier, well-trained and well-armed, can fight his way out of any situation."
_	His support for Marxist–Leninist politics was derived, in his own words, from the conviction that "[capitalism] lacks a moral basis" and that "it is the moral impulse [of communism] ... which constitutes the greatest attraction and presents the widest appeal."
_	With these words Rabinowitz laid aside his pen, “lifting his eyes to him who sits on high, asking him if he would forever be angry with his people, asking to be granted to hear that God had promised his people and his saints peace, and ending with the conviction that the help of the Lord is neigh (near) unto those who fear him” (p 29).
_	Some propose that feminist humor is essentially the humor of the oppressed: it perceives organized systems of oppression and exploitation and is based in the conviction that these systems are undesirable; therefore, feminist humor is based on visions of change.
_	From 1914 to the end of the New York period, however nonrepresentational, works by the artist continued to be shaped by his personal experience, by the conviction that art was a social function, susceptible to theoretical formulation, and imbued with optimism.
_	From the Old Testament, the early church retained the conviction that God is one.
_	Pope Benedict XVI has reiterated the conviction that human beings "are not some casual and meaningless product of evolution.
_	At the same time, he has promoted the study of the relationship between the concepts of creation and evolution, based on the conviction that there cannot be a contradiction between faith and reason.
_	This project is developed at length in his influential 1994 book, "Making It Explicit", and more briefly in "Articulating Reasons: An Introduction to Inferentialism" (2000); a chapter of that latter work, "Semantic Inferentialism and Logical Expressivism", outlines the main themes of representationalism (the tradition of basing semantics on the concept of representation) vs. inferentialism (the conviction for an expression to be meaningful is has to be governed by a certain kind of inferential rules) and inferentialism's relationship to logical expressivism (the conviction that "logic is expressive in the sense that it makes explicit or codifies certain aspects of the inferential structure of our discursive practice").
_	In a unanimous 8-0 ruling (Thurgood Marshall recused himself due to his previous involvement in the case as a Justice department official), the United States Supreme Court reversed the conviction that had been upheld by the Fifth Circuit.
_	As a specific example, all doctors and virologists agree that poliovirus causes paralysis in just a few infected subjects, and the success of the polio vaccine in preventing disease supports the conviction that the poliovirus is the causative agent.
_	The original seven partners, Lou Bakanowsky, Ivan Chermayeff, Peter Chermayeff, Alden Christie, Paul Dietrich, Tom Geismar, and Terry Rankine apply diverse skills in architecture, planning, exhibit design, graphics, industrial design, and filmmaking to create a single design studio founded on the conviction that each assignment, at any scale, should be an opportunity to apply fresh thinking in search of creative solutions.
_	He works from the conviction that a portrait is, as far as possible, an act of mutual engagement, and only through a long-term commitment to a place and to a community can a meaningful series of photographs be made.
_	As a monastic community, the Monks of New Skete live with the conviction that an authentic and vibrant monasticism is an essential ingredient to healthy Church life.
_	The Court's taxation decisions thus "reflected a central concern of the Framers that was an immediate reason for calling the Constitutional Convention: the conviction that in order to succeed, the new Union would have to avoid the tendencies toward economic Balkanization that had plagued relations among the Colonies and later among the States under the Articles of Confederation."
_	While it acknowledges a debt to pure faith in a literal reading of the Scriptures and centuries of legend, the conviction that the Ark literally lies on Ararat is a recent one, backed by a largely twentieth-century canon of evidence that includes stories of shadowy eyewitnesses, tales of mysterious missing photographs, rumors of atheistic conspiracy, and pieces of questionable "ark wood" from the mountain.
_	Kastler shares the conviction that the Sunday needs to be protected as work-free day of family and rest in order that children do not run the risk of suffering most from today's flexibilisation of our business world anymore.
_	The English school stands for the conviction that ideas, rather than simply material capabilities, shape the conduct of international politics, and therefore deserve analysis and critique.
_	In the conviction that work is a right and a duty and that every form of occupation deserves respect, the brothers and sisters should commit themselves to collaborate so that all persons may have the possibility to work and so that working conditions may always be more humane.
_	Yet despite the conviction that those track names suggest—and despite solid writing and production contributions from A-listers [...] it feels less vital than 2005's terrific "The Breakthrough" or 2007's "Growing Pains" [...]
_	This position draws on the conviction that God has "boundless love for every person, regardless of human merit or worthiness."
_	This was rooted in the conviction that being a housewife was a demanding activity in its own right for which young women of the middle class emerging at the time were frequently ill-prepared.
_	Indeed, the driving force behind the WDO is the conviction that neither national borders nor political or economic interests should limit access to adequate healthcare.
_	In the conviction that fellow citizens would come to acting in environmental protection questions, if only they were informed well enough and addressed in their responsibility, Gründler carried on an extensive public relations scheme, particularly by means of numerous flyers, which he distributed and had distributed particularly in the university town of Tübingen.
_	With the conviction that it is the duty of everyone to do what is within his power to alleviate human suffering, he bestowed an estate valued at $40 million for the creation of a charitable corporation devoted primarily to providing health care services to children.
_	This approach was based on the conviction that many development challenges are multidimensional.
_	Bacon, and indeed Hobbes, held the conviction that mathematics and the senses must be the basis of all rational sciences.
_	Despite their sometimes turbulent relationship, Stanley Zabar praised Klein saying, "What Murray brought was the conviction that the whole world must know about Zabar’s."
_	Driven by the conviction that failing Rachel led to her death, Locke seeks to protect both Terra and Celes as he fights with the Returners against the Empire; Locke is equally compelled to seek a means of restoring Rachel's life, as his drive to right his greatest wrong took him to the depths of the Phoenix Cave to acquire the "rebirth" power of the esper Phoenix to save his lost love.
_	The Coptic flag arose from the conviction that any ethnic group has a right to represent itself through an emblem or a flag in its larger society and the world.
_	It now proved impossible to contact the consul, which gave Aboutaleb the conviction that the consul knew of Kaya's attempt.
_	Lacking supplies, they turned around with the conviction that the far end of Africa had finally been reached.
_	From this experience and his (dual) architectural training, Tricaud acquired the conviction that an informed project approach could only be based on a subtle marriage between architecture and engineering, both of which providing different yet complementary sources of creation in their relationship to reality.
_	Central to Addey’s later work on the Harmonic theory of astrology was the conviction that the mystical and the scientific were not mutually exclusive and that neither was complete without the other.
_	In a column for Sampsonia Way Magazine Negash commented on the conviction that “the sentences carry no practical consequences for the professional freedom of those ‘convicted’ living in exile” and that “anyone, Ethiopian or not, who supports the democratic hope of the nation in any manner is considered an enemy of the state, or a ‘terrorist.’”
_	He holds the conviction that SAARC is the only vehicle that can contribute to peace and harmony in the region through effective economic integration.
_	The ethical base of Herbert's artistic work constitutes the conviction that justice of a particular matter and actions taken in its defense; do not depend on a chance of victory.
_	Not only were its readers receptive to its message, it "helped to make the conviction that English superiority to and dominance of other cultures was a matter of moral truth appealing and persuasive to generations of children".
_	He founded the center on what he described as “the belief that an approach of togetherness is needed to expand upon the conviction that all values, morals, and religions guide us to peace.
_	After the Rev John Buckely became Parish Priest of neighbouring Grenagh in 1869 he came to the conviction that his parish was too small.
_	As Robert Leroux argued, Bastiat had the conviction that Proudhon's anti-interest doctrine "was the complete antithesis of any serious approach".
_	From 1914 to the end of Gleizes's New York period—however nonrepresentational—works by the artist continued to be shaped by his personal experience, by the conviction that art was a social function, susceptible to theoretical formulation, and imbued with optimism.
_	As the work evolved, Davies came to the conviction that it "could mark the possibility of a beginning of an orchestral competence", and so decided to designate it a Symphony.
_	He expressed the conviction that nationalism wouldn’t succeed neither in destroying Yugoslavia nor in turning it into a centralized country.
_	While influenced by Marx's critique of capitalism as a form of power, Wolin's political thought is decidedly non-Marxist in his insistence on participatory democracy, the primacy of the political, and the conviction that a radical theory of democracy requires mapping the forms of power beyond the economy.
_	For me, the creative consequence was the conviction that the Polish-American characters of my first play were far more amusing and meaningful than the personnel of a normal theatrical penthouse."
_	It was established in 1971 "as an expression of the conviction that educational institutions have an important role to play in the encouragement and development of basic science as it applies to medicine".
_	Tavener believed he played as well as any infielder in workouts, but "Cobb couldn't get away from the conviction that a runt like me wasn't capable of sticking with a big league team."
_	Her lectures on "Heredity" and "Motherhood" carried the conviction that parenthood must be assumed as the highest, the holiest, and most sacred responsibility entrusted to us by God.
_	Monti's resignation came after he said that, following the PdL's withdrawal, he "matured [to] the conviction that we could not continue like this any longer," and that he could not govern with a loss of support for his platform.
_	Native Indian people killed dholes primarily to protect livestock, while British sporthunters during the British Raj did so under the conviction that dholes were responsible for drops in game populations.
_	Both documents are based on an understanding that current royalties management and cultural distribution systems have become obsolete in the digital age, and the conviction that free software and peer production and distribution is not incompatible with market strategies and commercial distribution.
_	Lewes wrote: "Charles Kean... seems now... settling down into the conviction that his talent does not lie in any Shakespearian sphere whatever, but in melodrames...
_	Denis expresses the conviction that the Virgin Mary was near death when Christ gave up his spirit; Van der Weyden's painting powerfully conveys this idea.
_	Learning that Pam has already departed, he aims to follow her, with the conviction that whatever life offers, they will be able to face it together.
_	In reading their minute directions for divers degrees of abstinence on various days, it is impossible to avoid being struck by the conviction that the great object of the framers of these rules was the general purpose of ensuring an ascetic mode of life.
_	Some within this movement held the conviction that the traditional Christian conceptions of God and humanity arise from a primitive consciousness, one that most civilized people have quite overcome.
_	Fortescue remarked that the medieval explanations are interesting as showing with what reverence people studied the text of the Canon and how, when every one had forgotten the original reasons for its forms, they still kept the conviction that the Mass is full of venerable mysteries and that all its clauses mean more than common expressions.
_	Mysticism refers to the conviction that all believers have the capability to experience God's love.
_	He was the follower of the conviction that political, legal, philosophical, religious, literary, artistic and other progress is based on the economic progress.
_	Their campaign against Beria was aided by fears that Beria was planning a military coup, and, according to Khrushchev in his memoirs, by the conviction that "Beria is getting his knives ready for us."
_	Willis, often noted for his enthusiasm, became an "effective motivator" as a captain; however, he was "no outstanding tactical genius" and "towards the end his feelings bordered on disgust at the conviction that some of England's cricketers accepted failure too readily.
_	"Offspring was not reared at the will of the father, but was taken and carried by him to a place called Lesche, where the elders of the tribes officially examined the infant, and if it was well-built and sturdy, they ordered the father to rear it, and assigned it one of the nine thousand lots of land; but if it was ill-born and deformed, they sent it to the so‑called Apothetae, a chasm-like place at the foot of Mount Taÿgetus, in the conviction that the life of that which nature had not well equipped at the very beginning for health and strength, was of no advantage either to itself or the state.".
_	He defined self-efficacy as the conviction that one can successfully execute the behavior required to produce the outcomes.
_	Based on the conviction that the internet must also follow the core requirements for a functioning market, the Center for the Economics of the Internet focuses its program on research and debate intended to show the importance and use of property and contract rights throughout the digital world.
_	To implement the decision of the Fourth Conference of the Parties of CMS to list the great bustard ("Otis tarda") on Appendix II of the Convention as a consequence of its unfavourable conservation status and the conviction that the species could benefit from an international agreement for its conservation and management and the middle-European population on Appendix I of the Convention taking into consideration the threatened status, an Article IV agreement was concluded in 2000 and entered into effect on 1 June 2001 after signature by the fifth range state.
_	He focused on providing the Centre with a strategic plan which was approved in the autumn of 2007 and was built on President Georges Pompidou’s founding vision: “the ambition to create an interface between the community and creation, with the conviction that a nation which opens up to the art of its time is more creative, more agile, stronger.”
_	These Adventists came to the conviction that Daniel 8:14 foretold Christ's entrance into the Most Holy Place of the heavenly sanctuary rather than his Second Coming.
_	In the conviction that this socialist unity party is doomed, died on 22 Fleissner April 1959 in his Leipzig home of a heart attack.
_	On the other hand, were the innovators, generally slightly younger than the first group, and who were inspired by Christian social ideas, and the conviction that social reforms were necessary; this second group was more favourable towards universal suffrage.
_	According to its website, “HASTAC members are motivated by the conviction that the digital era provides rich opportunities for informal and formal learning and for collaborative, networked research that extends across traditional disciplines, across the boundaries of the academy and the community, across the "two cultures" of humanism and technology, across the divide of thinking versus making, and across social strata and national borders."
_	This kind of environment gave Edelstein the conviction that he could be the creative source, something he still respects to this day whenever he teaches.
_	In the end the protesters left with the conviction that they couldn't wait to be allowed inside for the next debate.
_	Foyle now realizes the key to space-jaunting is faith: not the certainty of an answer, but the conviction that somewhere an answer exists.
_	Bose's correspondence (prior to 1939) reflects his deep disapproval of the racist practices of, and annulment of democratic institutions in Nazi Germany: "Today I regret that I have to return to India with the conviction that the new nationalism of Germany is not only narrow and selfish but arrogant".
_	But more than speak, ChildVoice acts on the conviction that children beaten down by war can be restored in safe communities with loving care, spiritual and psychosocial counselling, and effective education and vocational training.
_	This is based on the conviction that whenever an industry is able to regulate itself with active involvement of al stakeholders, control by government is unnecessary.
_	Because of his conflict with the advocates of the partition of Bosnia and Herzegovina and Franjo Tuđman's yes-men, he abandoned the holding of all political and military posts and leaves, with the aid of the EEC watchgroup into exile in Belgium, where he lives today, in the conviction that Tuđman worked on the conquest of Bosnia and Herzegovina, that he is guilty for the Croatian-Bosnian war, that he robbed Croatia and has divided her property among his yes-men, and also that he is the inspirer, and thereby also the evil doer of the murders of HOS generals Blaž Kraljević and Ante Paradžik.
_	Kiefer worked with the conviction that art could heal a traumatized nation and a vexed, divided world.
_	As stated, all children are born with the conviction that they are causing their parents to care for them and that they are receiving ideal care.
_	It was then that he came to the conviction that only radical acts of martyrdom could bring the liberation of Trieste from Austrian rule.
_	Members of the Historic Peace Churches such as Quakers, Mennonites, Amish, Old Order Mennonite, Conservative Mennonites, the Bruderhof Communities and Church of the Brethren object to war from the conviction that Christian life is incompatible with military action, because Jesus enjoins his followers to love their enemies and to refuse violence.
_	He accounts for the conviction that there is merely limited causality on the relationsship between activity of the brain and phenomenological events of the 1st person perspective due to non-linearity of cerebral information processing and supported logically by Gödel's incompleteness theorems.
_	That belief, along with the conviction that change in Iran must come peacefully and from within, has underpinned my work."
_	It is an example of the Renaissance tendency towards idealization, because of the conviction that wisdom could be extracted from the common people, whose pure tradition was thought to have conserved it, because people had always been close to nature.
_	Also, he researched intensively the problem of logical - semantic paradoxes, having the conviction that the solution to them was already available in the works of the Scholastic philosophers.
_	Karnabatt's pronouncements were rejected by one of "Rampa"s young journalists, Poldi Chapier, who held the conviction that Futurism was going to save the world of arts.
_	In the early 19th century, this view started to change, into the conviction that every evangelist should have sound knowledge in Buddhism.
_	All the representatives in opposition in the National Assembly shared the conviction that the bills, if passed into law, would be unconstitutional and undermine the constitutional and legislative authority of the Nevis Island Administration, as well as result in the destruction of the economy of Nevis.
_	In this position he worked hard to reconcile rival factions in the order and also founded new houses abroad (more so in Latin America as well as advancing the Bulgarian mission) and reformed the regulations of the order; he was firm in the conviction that a return to the original spirit and the Rule of the founder could be the singular formula for reviving the spirit of the charism.
_	Any rapprochement toward the Jewish state was curtailed because of the conviction that, in order to safeguard the wellbeing of Christians under Muslim-Arab rule, the Vatican would have to pay the political price of supporting Arab claims against Israel.
_	Each of the various philosophers, following Parmenides, derived from the Eleatics, the conviction that an existence could not pass into non-existence, and vice versa.
_	The Holy Synod made this decision with much sorrow, but with the conviction that it was a necessary action both for the salvation of the now Monk Seraphim and for the preservation of the good order and stability of the flock of Christ.
_	But it also happened after of facts that can not be omitted, including the intransigence of the Protector, Artigas who systematically and firmly refused to recognize the authority of the Supreme Director of the United Provinces of Rio de la Plata, which led him to the conviction that Artigas was intratable.
_	He spoke with the conviction that all these things were going to happen just like the Bible said.
_	Heinrich F. Liebrecht said Baeck's lectures helped him to discover wellsprings of strength and the conviction that his life had a purpose.
_	This was a period of specialization, consistent with the conviction that general philosophy would not yield precise results such as could be obtained in logic, psychology or the history of philosophy.
_	His personal research of more than 30 years and experiments with music's therapeutic powers led to the conviction that the healing powers of music should be available to everyone and Yoga Sangeeta carries the mission.
_	This position draws on the conviction that God has "boundless love for every person, regardless of human merit or worthiness."
_	At the heart of the campaign was the conviction that Andrew Jackson had been denied the presidency in 1824 only through a "corrupt bargain" devised by Adams and Clay; a Jackson victory promised to rectify this betrayal of the popular will.
_	Even when she was improvising, she always projected the conviction that she knew her ultimate goals, for she was precise and direct in her explanations."
_	They have been anxious, as we have all been anxious, to see outrages such as those of last year made impossible in the future, and as long as human nature is what it is, men must be deterred from crime by the conviction that it will be followed by punishment ; and not to have punished, and punished severely, the culprits of last year, would have been to invite a repetition of their crimes."
_	He argues that Germans are saddled with the conviction that German sins are unique and absolute, beyond comparison and beyond redemption, and that this conviction has become a hereditary burden, a self-demonisation that meant Germany felt obliged to accept an unsustainable number of migrants in 2015.
_	Anyone who has had much to do with such animals will hardly be able to escape the conviction that in many cases they now feel their inability to speak as a defect, although, unfortunately, it is one that can no longer be remedied because their vocal organs are too specialized in a definite direction.”
_	Secular liberalism also depends on the conviction that religious tradition and belief has no binding authority on society.
_	A vision, "One Chance for Every Person" was born from the conviction that it should be a provided access to hear the gospel at least once.
_	Bolivian President Evo Morales said that "we have arrived with the conviction that this must be the last summit without Cuba."
_	In the interim, the view had taken hold that the comparative method—previously used as a means of studying languages already known to be related and without any thought of classification—is the most effective means to establish genetic relationship, eventually hardening into the conviction that it is the only legitimate means to do so.
_	He had the conviction that a Sanskrit Bible would be an ideal medium to communicate with the intellectual mass of India.
_	The belief that children possess the ability to think abstractly from an early age, led him to the conviction that bringing logic to children's education earlier would help them to improve their reasoning skills.
_	Eliáš took office with the conviction that he might have a unique opportunity to help his country by covertly supporting the underground resistance to the Nazi occupiers.
_	Henry H. Breen, First Mayor of Castries, published "The History of St. Lucia" in 1844 and stated on page 159 that: "I have met with several well-informed persons in St. Lucia, who entertain the conviction that Mademoiselle Tascher de La Pagerie, better known as Empress Josephine, was born in the island of Saint Lucia and not Martinique as commonly supposed.
_	'The Taylor Brethren interpretation of events is rooted in the conviction that God had a vessel whom he would not allow to fail; Taylor spoke and acted as he did to bring out what was in others by provoking reaction, being willing to draw reproach on himself to do so.
_	"The false presupposition" in "Quest for a Living God", according to the doctrinal evaluation, "is the conviction that all names for God are metaphors."
_	In fact, the conviction that the world and man is something that had better not have been, is of a kind to fill us with indulgence towards one another.
_	This, together with the conviction that a university would attract new industry, inspired local teacher John Hume to create the University for Derry Committee.
_	It aimed not only defend human rights, but by being a group itself assert the formally guaranteed freedom of association; the diverse group was unified by the conviction that "the foundation of a normal life of society is recognition of the unconditional value of the human individual"; and the group's activity in defense of human rights was not a form of politics:
_	Underlying the school’s philosophy is the conviction that the primary obligation of all Christians is to witness to gospel values in that vocation to which God calls them.
_	DX gave the album 4 out of 5 stars, praising its "Hardcore lyricism backed by the conviction that has been lacking since the '90s," also calling it his "best-produced album in over a decade."
_	The deindustrialisation in Poland was based on a neoliberalism-inspired doctrine (systemic transformation according to the requirements of Western financial institutions) and on the conviction that industry-based economy was a thing of the past.
_	Resistance to female education also stemmed from the conviction that women would be supported by their husbands.
_	He may be driven by greed, neuroses, or the conviction that his cause is just, but he's driven by something, not unlike the things that drive a hero."
_	Bank's prose uses language that registers on the psyche: evoking the conviction that redemption can be gained by an Augustinian confession.
_	Ibsen shares with Kierkegaard the conviction that in every single human being there slumbers the soul of a warrior, an invincible power; but he cherishes it in another form than Kierkegaard, for whom the worth of the individual is something supernatural, while with Ibsen, we rest on human grounds.
_	Through the reading of popular scientific books I soon reached the conviction that much in the stories of the Bible could not be true.
_	The editors wrote in their first catalog that they founded their press "with a calling to contribute to broadening the horizons of knowledge available in our language, but also with the conviction that it is necessary to interrogate many of the ideas that organize the viewpoints of the contemporary world."
_	In his book, "Holy Cross and Christian Education" (2015), James B. King wrote, "This cross captures the central paradox that catapults Christians into another reality—the conviction that the Son of God died willingly, even for the sake of those who persecuted and abandoned him, in order to bring us through darkness to glory."
_	To implement the decision of the Seventh Conference of the Parties of CMS to list the Saiga Antelope "(Saiga tatarica)" on Appendix II of the Convention as a consequence of its endangered status and the conviction that conservation efforts of this species are dependent on international collaboration between the range States, an Article IV agreement was concluded and took effect on 24 September 2006 after signature by the third range State.
_	Gradually, detachment gave way to the conviction that something had to be done.
_	Irish military historian Pádraig Lenihan makes the point that the Ordinance "... illustrates the depth of the conviction that the Irish shared a common and irredeemable blood guilt.
_	This fundamental equality is justified by the conviction that the spiritual gifts that Assembly required for the service given by the Spirit "so that the self-will" (1 Corinthians 12:11).
_	While listening to the Rev. Pryce Davies preaching on the necessity of partaking of Holy Communion Harris came to the conviction that he had received mercy through the blood of Christ.
_	“A strong and persistent cross-gender identification in adolescents and adults [can cause a] disturbance manifested by symptoms such as a stated desire to be the other sex, frequent passing as the other sex, desire to live or be treated as the other sex, or the conviction that he or she has the typical feelings and reactions of the other sex” (APA, 2000).
_	A short time before, he had written to Susanne, "I suppose it is the imperfection of it all that I feel, and then the longing for our life together breaks through; but soon my soul is soothed and consoled by the conviction that this period has to be, that without it there can be no perfection."
_	"Le Géant" was badly damaged at the end of its second flight, leading Nadar to the conviction that heavier-than-air machines would be more successful.
_	After the run of "Murphy Brown" ended in 1998, CBS approached her to cover stories for "60 Minutes", an offer she declined, with the conviction that she didn't personally want to blur the lines between actor and journalist at the time.
_	Jock was partly driven by the guilt of his family background, but also by the conviction that every business has a responsibility towards its workers; and that profit alone should not be the guiding principle of society.
_	From this consideration derives a non-antiquarian taste for research and the conviction that rigorous knowledge of the historical processes is an adequate and exhaustive way to participate in the collective intellectual and spiritual dynamism by which research is continuously increased.
_	CIMA's mission is based on the conviction that free and independent media play an indispensable role in developing sustainable democracies around the world.
_	The first idea, listed as (a), is "the conviction that the physical world can be the carrier of spiritual value."
_	His chief work is his "Lezioni di letteratura italiana", of which the dominant note is the conviction that Italian literature "is as the very soul of the nation, seeking, in opposition to medieval mysticism, reality, freedom, independence of reason, truth and beauty" (P. Villari).
_	Even when he consciously departs from nature he must do it with the conviction that it is only better to interpret her.
_	Driven by the conviction that the body of Christ is in essence relational and would eventually come to fullness of stature, and influenced by the ideas of British restorationism, Coombs began to gather around him a number of other pastors and leaders with the same vision.
_	During the 1930s, under Hirst's direction, Dunford House continued to preach what Howe describes as "the pure milk of the Cobdenian faith": the conviction that in Britain and in continental Europe, peace and prosperity would develop from individual ownership of the soil.
_	Dubnow writes: "Jewish history [inspires] the conviction that Jewry at all times, even in the period of political independence, was pre-eminently a spiritual nation."
_	Further, like them, we held the conviction that not a college, but only a very fine university, even if small, could make any difference in the nation’s educational scheme."
_	Rule creators generally express the conviction that some kind of threatening social evil exists that must be combated.
_	It refers to the conviction that one can successfully execute the behavior required to produce the outcome.
_	The New College Plan is based on the conviction that the average student entering one of the better colleges is capable of far more independence than he now demonstrates, but that he must be given proper training and proper opportunities."
_	He said he did this "because of the conviction that another war was shaping up, that the United Nations could not keep the peace, and that the only way to prevent it was to work for development of the UN into a stronger war-prevention body."
_	But if he has gone too far too fast, he can take a governor's small comfort from the conviction that one year—if not this year—his state will forget the anthills and look with satisfaction on the considerable movements of home-grown progressive government.
_	Thus, by his piece-meal examination (this is what "hatätä" means), Zera Yacob arrives at an argument for the existence of God (an essence uncreated and eternal), based on the impossibility of an infinite chain of causes, and at the conviction that the Creation is good, because God is good.
_	Infused with the conviction that the ideas of the academy matter, we foster knowledge that resonates within and beyond the walls of the university.
_	If one needs to seek a unifying theme to all of them, it is the conviction that selection is the basis of life processes, rather than instruction.
_	Governor Gipps and the Colonial Secretary Lord Glenelg agreed that an important measure to prevent frontier conflict was to impress Aboriginal people with "the conviction that the laws of the colony will be equally administered for their protection from wrong and injury as for that of European settlers".
_	Fascinated with the talented young artists they discovered daily through social networks, and with the conviction that it was possible to create an innovative publishing model for art, they embarked themselves on a new venture.
_	Volf’s theological work is predicated on the conviction that “private” and “public” spheres cannot be separated, though they must be distinguished.
_	"Augustinian values" are "Christian values" which Augustine lived and taught in the conviction that such values contribute to the fulfillment of the Lord’s twofold commandment of love in the spirit of the Beatitudes.
_	May stated, "From the moment I first heard Kerry sing, I was entranced, and felt the conviction that I would one day make her album.
_	The Editorial Institute at Boston University was founded in 2000 by Christopher Ricks and Geoffrey Hill with "the conviction that the textually sound, contextually annotated edition is central to the intellectual life of many disciplines."
_	At the bottom of this outlook lies the conviction that man deep in his soul is a scoundrel, moved only by practical interests and egotistical, mostly dirty impulses, and for this reason one has to be on one's guard with one's neighbour and always keep 'a stone by one's bosom'."
_	In his 1983 book "Beyond Objectivism and Relativism: Science, Hermeneutics, and Praxis", Bernstein diagnosed a serious issue that affects much of modern philosophy as it oscillates unendingly between two untenable positions; on the one hand, the dogmatic search for absolute truths, and on the other, the conviction that “anything goes” when it comes to the justification of our most cherished beliefs and ideas.
_	He has explored different forms of writing and varied terminologies for expressing what resists expression, based on the conviction that such a resistance requires constant vigilance and innovative writing, the constant production and transformation of forms of knowledge, especially including philosophy, whose relations to art, literature, science, and religion enrich it profoundly with novel and imaginative questions and answers.
_	The Catholic Church's commitment to ecumenism is based on the conviction that a divided Christianity "openly contradicts the will of Christ, scandalizes the world, and damages the holy cause of preaching the Gospel to every creature."
_	There were two men among us who persevered with the conviction that it was possible, in this context, to marshal facts and law and thus win vindication.
_	But the protesters formed their own alliance with American friends, peace groups and churches, in the conviction that transatlantic cooperation need not be guided by military prerogative.
_	Instone stated that the sexually charged paintings aimed to express the conviction that painting and making marks on a surface can achieve a sense of reality like no other medium.
_	It is the conviction that there is such a dimension to reality, Hampson has said, that led her to abandon secular history for theology.
_	The confidence of the exegete and preacher arises from the conviction that his or her mind depends on God absolutely ("DDC", 1.1.1).
_	He says to Fr. Pastells, "In the conviction that I find myself before the Supreme Problem, which confused voices desire to explain to me, I cannot but answer: 'That may be so; but the God that I surmise is much greater, much better: "Plus Supra"!"
_	In her preface to the book, Didion writes, "I went to San Francisco because I had not been able to work in some months, had been paralyzed by the conviction that writing was an irrelevant act, that the world as I had understood it no longer existed.
_	As may be witnessed even into the Christian era, not least by the complaints of various philosophers over popular beliefs, traditional Greek believers maintained the conviction that certain individuals were resurrected from the dead and made physically immortal and that for the rest of us, we could only look forward to an existence as disembodied and dead souls.
_	Riddle was a devout atheist and held the conviction that religion poses a serious threat to scientific advancements.
_	Senior members of the Law School faculty, and other faculties, who did not agree with Cohen's views on the admissions matter, nevertheless wrote angrily to the President, Lee Bollinger, in the conviction that technical violations of procedure were being arbitrarily invoked against him, and that the reputation of the University had been besmirched.
_	It does so in the conviction that few of us have yet comprehended the all but incredible destructive power of this weapon, and that everyone might well take time to consider the terrible implications of its use.
_	The festival is organized with the conviction that human experiences in the world’s highlands, especially those in the developing countries, is worth documenting and sharing.
_	While officials had originally expressed the conviction that the clock might help to establish Mecca as a prime meridian, it was instead set to Arabia Standard Time (UTC+3).
_	According to Mackay, this concept of sorcery is characterized by the conviction that those guilty engage in six activities:
_	Every evening he would ask the servants in the sanctuary for a bit of the oil that burnt in the lamp and use it as ointment to rub in the stub of his leg, with the conviction that he would so be able to draw the aid of the Virgin upon him.
_	As usual Bronson must rely upon the conviction that there are viewers who find silence eloquent."
_	"If the balance of opinion in Hungary were always determined by sober political calculation, this brave and independent people, isolated in the broad ocean of Slav populations, and comparatively insignificant in numbers, would remain constant to the conviction that its position can only be secured by the support of the German element in Austria and Germany.
_	Danneels has never wavered from the conviction that "a society that encourages abortion of those that are born in the margins of society or that do not have the chance to be loved abandons its humanizing role and ultimately condemns itself".
_	Much of the legend and symbolism of modern Polish patriotism derives from this period, including the conviction that Polish independence is a necessary element of a just and legitimate European order.
_	With the conviction that sex was political, the series was created with the focus of sexuality from a female perspective.
_	He sees all in his Atman, but does not have the conviction that I am Brahman.
_	In reply to a letter, Eulenburg wrote his friend, General Helmuth von Moltke, the Chief of the General Staff, told him that he had "arrived at the conviction that-if it were still at all possible for us to win-we "had" to attack this year."
_	Humans begin with the conviction that justice is a genuine virtue.
_	Thus, the conviction that the well-constituted human practical reason operates with considerations of justice, means that "taking account of other people in that sort of way" is "how human beings live together."
_	Depressed by the conviction that an unknown party had tried to kill her, and suffering from a cold, Stanford shortly thereafter decided to sail to Hawaii, with plans to continue on to Japan.
_	Bron Taylor at the University of Florida coined the term "Dark Green Religion" to describe a set of beliefs and practices centered on the conviction that nature is sacred.
_	Rotations brought some of the most famous names of the German army there, such as Goring, Ribbentrop or Guderian, and gave the German high command the conviction that this stronghold, thought to be untakeable, was unquestionably German.
_	She suggests that there are "many maps, many windows," arguing that "we need "scientific pluralism"—the recognition that there are many independent forms and sources of knowledge—rather than reductivism, the conviction that one fundamental form underlies them all and settles everything."
_	Basilian Father Thomas Rosica says, "Angels are very important, because they provide people with an articulation of the conviction that God is intimately involved in human life."
_	The most significant is that it rests upon the conviction that there really is a "universal, hidden, esoteric dimension of reality" that objectively exists.
_	He eventually came to the conviction that virtually no one in national politics identified with these people anymore.
_	Galbraith was of the opinion that the Great Crash had burned itself so deeply into the national consciousness that America had been spared another bubble up to the present time (1954).; however he thought the chances of another speculative orgy which characterized the 1929 crash as rather good as he felt the American people remained susceptible to the conviction that unlimited rewards were to be had and that they individually were meant to share in it.
_	The measures hitherto adopted to discourage and prevent such acts have failed of success, and the governor-general in council is deeply impressed with the conviction that the abuses in question cannot be effectually put an end to without abolishing the practice altogether.
_	Another remarked that "to her the summer work, the mingling with the representatives of many industries, of many localities, of many points of view, had brought home the conviction that the problem of each working woman was the problem of all, the problem of all that of each."
_	At the heart of its philosophy is the conviction that its students are "children first, gifted second."
_	From the very start, the Beyond War group strongly held the conviction that “Life is at a crossroads.
_	An agreement on the fundamentals of the faith articulated in the creeds; the existence of Protestant and catholic elements creating both a "via media" as well as a "union of opposites"; and the conviction that there is development in understanding the truth, expressed more in practical terms rather than theoretical ones.
_	Through his writing ran the conviction that "on every real bicycle there is the unseen pennant of progress, the standard of democracy, (and) the banner of freedom."
_	A 1933 pamphlet bragged that the apprentices "learn the ancient craft of printing on the finest of modern equipment" and "are imbued with the conviction that the better they do their work, the more they will earn and the higher they will rise.
_	The organization was built around the conviction that better outcomes would be achieved if policy makers and opinion leaders were armed with credible data and analysis about key issues surrounding quality of life in Massachusetts.
_	Alma mater traditions aside, Litalien speculates that Wat Phra Dhammakaya's emphasis on respect for hierarchy and seniority comes from the conviction that position and status are gained by merit-making and karma.
_	Ilze and Grant had studied together at the University of Washington, and both shared the conviction that architecture and landscape architecture are inseparable disciplines (Enlow, 6–7).
_	The main ideas in creation science are: the belief in "creation "ex nihilo"" (Latin: out of nothing); the conviction that the Earth was created within the last 6,000 years; the belief that mankind and other life on Earth were created as distinct fixed "baraminological" "kinds"; and the idea that fossils found in geological strata were deposited during a cataclysmic flood which completely covered the entire Earth.
_	There are proposals that can be considered as coming from the center-right, such as the efficiency of the state, sound fiscal and monetary policies, the conviction that work is what takes to get people out of poverty.
_	If this is so, then the presence of his son in Cupar, south of the Mounth, reinforces the conviction that Domnall fought, not for the Mormaerdom of Moray, but for the kingship of Scotland.
_	The basis of this was the conviction that being a student meant being something different from the rest of the population.
_	To implement the decision of the Conference of the Parties of CMS to list the Gorilla on Appendix I of the Convention and taking into consideration the unfavourable conservation status and the conviction that the Gorilla would significantly benefit from international cooperation that could be achieved by a multilateral Agreement, an Article IV Agreement was concluded in 2007.
_	This almost negative-theological trait of his later religious thought is accompanied by a secularising turn – his later philosophy is shot through with the conviction that "The secular is the miraculous."
_	In 1954 he attracted criticism from both Israel and the Arab world for the administration's policy declaration in which he told the Israelis, "You should drop the attitude of a conqueror and the conviction that force is the only policy that your neighbors will understand," and told the Arabs, "You should accept this state of Israel as an accomplished fact."
_	The idea of the sign of contradiction is related to the conviction that, while human reason is still operative, the distortion of fallen human nature causes concrete instances of reasoning to grope and often to go astray.
_	I have come to the conviction that nothing could have a greater future or a more beneficent role than the monarchy, if it could only make up its mind to become a social monarchy.
_	The Portuguese optimism of 1968 was reinforced by the conviction that local populations are not very permeable to Frelimo propaganda, and still less available to organise and fight because they are peasants with little political awareness, they are dispersed and have some tradition of emigration to South Africa.
_	His resignation of the latter pastorate was due to the conviction that his views were no longer in harmony with the orthodox beliefs; and in the same spring (1847) he accepted a call to the pastorate of two Unitarian parishes, in Kensington and Hampton Falls, New Hampshire.
_	The aim is to embrace the human family, shedding light with the conviction that understanding the world's problems and possibilities moves us towards solutions."
_	He was quick to recognise that sectarianism was a useful ally to divide the rebels and prevent the United Irishmen achieving their goal of uniting Protestant, Catholic and Dissenter, writing in June 1798; ""In the North nothing will keep the rebels quiet but the conviction that where treason has broken out the rebellion is merely popish"".
_	Opponents of the repeal based their arguments on the conviction that to decriminalise homosexuality would result in a breakdown of the family unit, compromise Singapore's position on procreation, and lead to future undesirable scenarios such as the approval of bestiality and paedophila.
_	Both the practice of self-mortification as a form of penance, and the conviction that suffering can help a person to acquire sanctity, have ample precedent in Catholic teaching and practice.
_	One of Waldorf education's central premises is that all educational and cultural institutions should be self-governing and should grant teachers a high degree of creative autonomy within the school; this is based upon the conviction that a holistic approach to education aiming at the development of free individuals can only be successful when based on a school form that expresses these same principles.
_	An analysis of the reports of our representatives, together, with the reports and statements of the Attorney General's office, the office of the Public Prosecutor, and the Police Department, also the testimony at the trial of the defendants, makes it impossible to escape the conviction that the kidnaping and assault was not caused by those accused, with the attendant circumstances alleged by Mrs. Massie.
_	The important thing is the conviction that you put into it."(Il Tirreno, January 1997,"Un cuore buono, una mano felice".)
_	Working from the conviction that art can be a catalyst for urban renewal, Jones acted as the visionary and creative director, inviting artists of all disciplines to collaborate on site-specific events drawing the public to the Tiber’s banks.
_	He joined the New Connexion Methodists; a debate (1845) at Newcastle upon Tyne between Joseph Barker and William Cooke led him to the conviction that doctrine must be expressed in ‘the language of scripture.’
_	"Hundreds of Muslims from all over Arab and non-Arab countries go to Iraq to help the resistance end the occupation, spurred by the conviction that jihad is a duty against the occupier," said Hudayfa Azzam ... "The Iraqi resistance was the fruit of the American occupation" and buyoed by the "fatwa (religious decree) which considers jihad a duty when a Muslim country is occupied," he said.
_	In Saratov, Stolypin had come to the conviction that the open field system had to be abolished.
_	Academic freedom is the conviction that the freedom of inquiry by faculty members is essential to the mission of the academy as well as the principles of academia, and that scholars should have freedom to teach or communicate ideas or facts (including those that are inconvenient to external political groups or to authorities) without being targeted for repression, job loss, or imprisonment.
_	In spite of all these reversals of fate Job remains steadfast not only to his faith in God, but also to the conviction that this sudden reversal of the divine will cannot be the consequence of his own sins, since he does not believe that such exist.
_	In the 1990 introduction to "Nationalism, Colonialism, and Literature" — a collection of three Field Day Pamphlets by Terry Eagleton, Fredric Jameson and Edward Said — Deane writes: "Field Day's analysis of the (Northern Irish) situation derives from the conviction that it is, above all, a colonial crisis" (Eagleton 6).
_	The Lutheran priests and believers remained of the conviction that they could only adhere to their Lutheran faith when following the wish of the Hungarians (or the Austrians) and considering themselves "Wendish-Slovenes".
_	Some reasons are: the principle of nonviolence (ahimsa) applied to animals; the intention to offer only "pure" (vegetarian) food to a deity and then to receive it back as prasad; and the conviction that a sentient diet is beneficial for a healthy body and mind and that non-vegetarian food is not recommended for a better mind and for spiritual development.
_	This view is supported in part by the conviction that there is no clear, general, and principled difference between one language and the next, and which may apply across the field of all languages.
_	The religious studies scholar Wouter Hanegraaff charactised Paganism as encompassing "all those modern movements which are, first, based on the conviction that what Christianity has traditionally denounced as idolatry and superstition actually represents/represented a profound and meaningful religious worldview and, secondly, that a religious practice based on this worldview can and should be revitalized in our modern world."
_	In a very negative review of Žižek's magnum opus "Less than Nothing", the British political philosopher John Gray attacked Žižek for his celebrations of violence, his failure to ground his theories in historical facts, and his ‘formless radicalism’ which, according to Gray, professes to be communist yet lacks the conviction that communism could ever be successfully realized.
_	Beaman engages Connolly’s notion of agnostic respect as foundational to the work of deep equality, noting that “respect is 'agonistic' because it requires the abandonment of rightness and the conviction that one is imbued with the truth through some sort of transcendent authority" (98).
_	Those who still fought against Charles did so with the full determination to ensure the triumph of their cause, and with the conviction that the only possible way was the annihilation of the enemy's armed forces.
_	Among large numbers of former German officers, however, there was the conviction that no future German army would be possible without the rehabilitation of the Wehrmacht.
_	A new wave of conservationism emerged in the early 21st century inspired by America's history of sound natural resource management; they were united by the conviction that the United States of America should take steps to export these practices throughout the world, helping strengthen national security.
_	Fredrik Bull was sent abroad to study Hollerith's systems, returning with the conviction that Hollerith's systems were expensive and unstable.
_	"Beliefs include the conviction that there are deep and hidden things about an individual that only diviners, priests, and other qualified persons can unravel.
_	Since that period an entirely new principle had been adopted in the case of the Main Line Railway, and when they hesitated to pay their special rate, they acted on the conviction that it was the Government, and not they, who had broken faith."
_	Members of the Historic Peace Churches such as Quakers, Mennonites, Amish or Church of the Brethren object to war from the conviction that Christian life is incompatible with military action, because Jesus enjoins his followers to love their enemies and to refuse violence.
_	Thomas Kinsella wrote ""I emerged with the conviction that Lady Gregory's 'Cuchulian of Muirthemne', though only a paraphrase, gave the best idea of the Ulster stories"".
_	A paper about his art discussed that "...his visual art suggests that the sign of the buoyancy of culture is the conviction that the underpinning logos should be freedom–and most specifically, free speech..."
_	Thaer commented in his diary, "personally I had to force myself to the conviction that the troops now operated under a crushing burden of disappointment.
_	At the same time the universal church of Rome had to face emergence of the lay interests of the City itself, spurred on by the conviction that the Roman people, though impoverished and abased, had again the right to elect the Western Emperor.
_	It is based on the conviction that new developments within, and discoveries by, the scientific community are relevant for the world at large rather than just for the scientific experts themselves, and that technological progress can never be free of ethical implications.
_	Reflected in the title of this report is the conviction that pornography represents human discord, far from the mutual sexual delight depicted biblically in the Song of Songs.
_	When reporting laughter, Herodotus does so in the conviction that it tells the reader something about the future and/or the character of the person laughing.
_	The terror caused by the fall of the southern town and the conviction that no reinforcements would arrive from Castile forced the decision to deliver the besieged city before suffering more casualties.
_	Observing that such a thing could never have happened in Europe, the British historian Paul Johnson cites this astounding feat as a dramatic example of American determination and ingenuity: based on the conviction that anything material is possible.
_	There are three main reasons for this: the principle of nonviolence (ahimsa) applied to animals, the intention to offer only vegetarian food to a deity and then to receive it back as prasad, and the conviction that non-vegetarian food is detrimental for the mind and for spiritual development.
_	He was of the conviction that the term liquid crystal did not bear scrutiny.
_	The essay, in its discussion of liberty, justice, and law, was a veiled critique of Nazi Germany; in the "remarkable" essay he cites de Toqueville, "I have always loved liberty; all my thoughts lead me to the conviction that without it there can be no moral or political greatness."
_	Having the conviction that a well-rounded classical education was necessary in his work as an interpreter, he studied at the Staats Gymnasium in Vienna and at the University, where he was a pupil in philosophy under Von Zimmerman and Brentano and in esthetics under Hanslick.
_	"Over the years I have arrived at the conviction that a good diplomatic interpreter must possess three characteristics:
_	""My father justified his combat against the Republic with the conviction that this regime did not correspond to the needs of the Country, nor that it expressed the mood of the nation.""
_	These finding further strengthened the conviction that Israel does suffer from a problem of concentration and pushed to Concentration Committee, which was yet to publish its interim report, to follow suit.
_	In the contemporary book review "New York Society Held up to Scorn in three New Books" (15 October 1905) "The New York Times" critic said that "The House of Mirth" is "a novel of remarkable power" and that "its varied elements are harmoniously blended, and [that] the discriminating reader who has completed the whole story in a protracted sitting, or two, must rise from it with the conviction that there are no parts of it which do not properly and essentially belong to the whole.
_	He does so in the conviction that dialogical relationships between individuals, groups, and cultures cannot exist in separation of productive dialogical relationships which individuals develop with themselves.
_	This led him to the conviction that personal work was most effective, and forsaking all else, -- secular papers and books, even the bedside of his sick wife at times, -- he gave himself over to inquiries from early morning till late at night.
_	I, the disability protection system in Europe covered only war veterans and soldiers, based on the conviction that people are owed this protection when they have sacrificed for their country.
_	Once again, the conviction that strict neutrality was most suitable for Sweden dominated Swedish society.
_	With the conviction that Mahatma Gandhi’s Philosophy of equality, peace, non-violence and communal harmony is relevant even today and in fact, is the need of the hour, the Yashwantrao Chavan Maharashtra Open University has instituted the Mahatma Gandhi Chair.
_	The third is the conviction that without repenting and accepting Jesus, one cannot reach Christ... what a Christian obtains is the awareness of the noble qualities.
_	""Respect des fonds"" rose from the conviction that records entering an archive have an essential connection to the person or office that generated and used them; archivists consider all the records originating with a particular administrative unit (whether former, or still existing) to be a separate archival grouping, or "fonds", and seek to preserve and describe the records accordingly, with close attention to evidence of how they were organized and maintained at the time they were created.
_	The Church of Scientology's objection to secular ideas about mental health are religious in nature, based on the conviction that humans are essentially divine beings who have been marred by negative experiences acquired over several lifetimes.
_	The southern members of the constitutional commission pressed for a bicameral system because of the conviction that their nobility should be given a place in the legislature.
_	The founders were faced with life-threatening situations a number of times, which they braved through with the conviction that a viable alternative is possible.
_	"From the moment I first heard Kerry sing, I was entranced, and felt the conviction that I would one day make an album for her.
_	They must therefore be developed within a monist worldview (the conviction that there is one world and one world only, and that everything within this one world can affect everything else).
_	Prep teaching embodies the conviction that work is the basic medium of self-actualization and discovery.
_	He established the first journalism courses (which were limited and only lasted several years), and he added both engineering courses and a business school and a law school to the college curriculum, under the conviction that those occupations should be intimately and inextricably linked with the liberal arts.
_	John Gray states that "When we tolerate a practice, a belief or a character trait, we let something be that we judge to be undesirable, false or at least inferior; our toleration expresses the conviction that, despite its badness, the object of toleration should be left alone."
_	The following January, County Judge Y. Sepulveda charged the Grand Jury to do its duty toward ferreting out the leaders of the mob, and so wipe out this reproach to the city; but the Grand Jury expressed the conviction that if the law had hitherto been faithfully executed in Los Angeles, such scenes in broad daylight would never have taken place.
_	We have come together to do this work out of our experiences as women of faith who share the conviction that our tradition has the resilience, the inexhaustible resources and creativity, to sustain a re-imagining of its most central symbols."
_	According to Heiko Oberman, "[t]he basis of Luther's anti-Judaism was the conviction that ever since Christ's appearance on earth, the Jews have had no more future as Jews."
_	He claimed his troops' courage came from "the conviction that we are fighting a just cause.
_	Joseph M. Field founded Entercom on October 21, 1968, on the conviction that FM broadcasting, then in its infancy, would eventually surpass AM broadcasting as the leading radio band.
_	Obviously, such firmness and steadfastness can be shown only by the person who has the conviction that the power of His Lord is the supreme power, that all powers of the world are insignificant against Him, and that no one can harm the one who has taken
_	What began to change in 1967 ... was the conviction that the forces of good would inevitably prevail."
_	Ambolodto has experienced war first-hand, which has left her with the conviction that war is unacceptable.
_	It will begin from confidence and pride in America, from a sense that our challenge is to build on our strengths to address our weaknesses, and from the conviction that chief among those strengths are our democratic capitalism, our ideals of liberty and equality under the law, and our roots in the longstanding traditions of the West.
_	Docherty was notorious for his right-wing conspiratorial beliefs, and was firmly of the conviction that a conspiracy existed between the Catholic Church, the major denominations of Protestantism, the ecumenical movement, the governments of the Republic of Ireland and the United Kingdom, communists, and even elements within the Ulster Unionist Party, to force a united Ireland and "Rome rule" on Ulster Protestants.
_	Starting from the conviction that sculpture shall have a role in the requalification of the urban architectural context – opinion matured between 1958 and 1972, during informal experiences made on a big scale in Italy and in the United States – the sculptor formalized his own ideas, both at a theoretical and utopist level, in a series of project studies (Enrico Crispolti, Francesco Somaini, "Urgency in the city", Mazzotta, Milan, 1972).
_	And the pleasantest feeling of all is the conviction that "Dorothy" completely deserves the admiration we lavished on it.
_	We are engulfed in flame, we vibrate; our spirit is vibratory, agile; it covers immense spaces in seconds; we feel in ourselves the conviction that we can achieve extraordinary things.
_	Edwards' climbing style was described by Geoffrey Winthrop Young as "serpentine and as powerful as an anaconda coiling up loose or wet overhangs, I had the conviction that human adhesiveness in movement could go no further".
_	In this sense, Anglicans have viewed their theology as strongly incarnational – expressing the conviction that God is revealed in the physical and temporal things of everyday life and the attributes of specific times and places.
_	The "coup d'état" of Muammar al-Gaddafi (influenced by Gamal Abdel Nasser’s Arab nationalism) was driven by the conviction that foreigners were still exploiting Libya, and Gaddafi made their eviction a hallmark of his program.
_	Unlike other monastic reformers of the era, such as Dom Gueranger in France and the Wolter brothers in Germany, who based their reforms on the study of theology and history, however, he came to the conviction that a stricter asceticism necessarily meant a better monasticism.
_	After what is described as answering the devil's accusations, he received Communion, and came to the conviction that he had received mercy through the blood of Christ.
_	Ludwig's philhellenism was in fact grounded in the conviction that the Greek revolt against Ottoman rule represented the return of antique Hellenic virtue.
_	Deep in their conscientiousness was the conviction that any person who had overstepped the laws of morality and spiritual righteousness deserved what was coming to them, and to help miscreants out of the troubles visited upon them by God was just something you didn't do.
_	He writes that his motivation lies in the conviction that ignoring or stereotyping Palestinian Christians is a contradiction of faith and immoral before God.
_	Who lives in the conviction that the war is wrong, which must and consequences and explain to the magistrate that he would not bear arms and that he would rather die himself before he was ready to kill his enemy."
_	She was particularly critical of those missionaries who had attempted to bring change by enforcing an American system of beliefs on the people, remarking, “One mistake of too many Western missionaries to China was the conviction that they bore to the East all the tidings and all the knowledge of a better way of life.
_	Others disagree, claiming that collaboration with Israel was based on the conviction that there was a commonality of interest between the two countries.
_	It simply means that the Orthodox do not want to support the conviction that God had somehow to intervene at the moment of Mary's conception with a special action to remove the "stain" of the original sin transmitted by the act of human reproduction because, simply put, the Orthodox do not hold that such a "stain" exists.
_	Like many Platonists, Taurus held the conviction that the world was eternal and un-created.
_	The name was chosen to reflect the conviction that segregated ensembles were "not of today's world".
_	Rather, human conviction that justice is a virtue and that considerations of justice are genuine reasons for action, is the conviction that the kind of rational being that we are, namely, human beings, is of the first type.
_	Common to all theistic religions is a pronounced religiocentrism, expressed most poignantly in the conviction that one's own religion is the one and only true one, and that all the other faiths are erroneous and hence depreciable.
_	One reviewer of the book said the account "captures much of what has led Czechs to the conviction that they live in a corrupted, clientist country – and (paradoxically) then to vote for the ANO movement."
_	In an attempt to counter the exclusive process of private school student selection, Giles instituted a first-come, first-served admissions policy based on the conviction that his unique educational programme would improve the overall academic achievement of any child, regardless of his or her initial or apparent aptitude.
_	With the conviction that sex was political, the series was created with the focus of sex and sexuality from a female perspective.
_	Richard Taruskin asserts that Schoenberg committed what he terms a "poietic fallacy", the conviction that what matters most (or all that matters) in a work of art is the making of it, the maker's input, and that the listener's pleasure must not be the composer's primary objective .
_	The toniclike effect of the entire affair buoyed spirits of Albuquerque's many boosters and reinforced in them the conviction that their city, in the century stretching ahead, was marked for bright and wondrous things.
_	What these supporters typically have in common was the conviction that people and organizations should reliably be able to access and view their photographs well into the future, and that this requires open documentation of the formats of the files used.
_	This view, however, has been modified at times, as national language translations of the "Manifesto de la Sennaciistoj" were published out of the conviction that this would help to popularize Esperanto.
_	In 1975, Italian author Umberto Eco argued that at Disney's parks, "we not only enjoy a perfect imitation, we also enjoy the conviction that imitation has reached its apex and afterwards reality will always be inferior to it".
_	The constitution of the Byzantine Empire was based on the conviction that it was the earthly copy of the Kingdom of Heaven.
_	According to ABC News, the initiative is founded on the conviction that "The campaign against Israel corrodes the international system from within, beginning with the United Nations."
_	He participates in the conviction that Beauty "is the greatest welfare, as a definite artistic synthesis of Goodness and Truth" (Derzhavyn), he advocates the autonomy of art, which, in his opinion, "is completely independent of social, political, climatic or any other circumstances", he defends the long duration of the traditions of artistic creativity, as a contrast and in opposition to the so-called post-modernism and its negation of past times artistic achievements.
_	In fact, the Convention as a whole rests upon the unanimous rejection of this phenomenon of illegal child removals and upon the conviction that the best way to combat them at an international level is to refuse to grant them legal recognition.
_	The BVP approach is based on the conviction that minimizing risks or eliminating risks when allocated information is effectively used for a proper choice.
_	Influenced by these writings, and having witnessed a number of phenomena that he could not explain, he formed the conviction that there existed a hidden truth not to be found in science or in mainstream religion.
_	MacArthur viewed biblical faith as always including the notion of surrender and obedience, while Hodges taught that biblical faith was the conviction that something is true.
_	Dalhousie, driven by the conviction that all India needed to be brought under British administration, began to apply what was called the doctrine of lapse.
_	The main ideas in creation science are: the belief in "creation "ex nihilo"" (Latin: out of nothing); the conviction that the Earth was created within the last 6,000–10,000 years; the belief that humans and other life on Earth were created as distinct fixed "baraminological" "kinds"; and the idea that fossils found in geological strata were deposited during a cataclysmic flood which completely covered the entire Earth.
_	Ruth M. Rothstein (April 5, 1923 - August 4, 2013) was a nationally recognized public health activist who lived by the conviction that health care is a right, not a privilege, and that institutions have a responsibility to the community.
_	On the other hand, the Italian philosopher Gianni Vattimo alongside the Spanish philosopher Santiago Zabala in their 2011 book "Hermeneutic Communism: from Heidegger to Marx" affirm that "together with Richard Rorty we also consider it a flaw that 'the main thing contemporary academic Marxists inherit from Marx and Engels is the conviction that the quest for the cooperative commonwealth should be scientific rather than utopian, knowing rather than romantic.'
_	Miletić had reached the conviction that the Serbian movement in the Vojvodina could be brought into line with the general Serbian aims of liberty and unity, and also with the wider European movement.
_	The reverses at Sentry Hill and Moutoa Island reinforced Māori belief in Te Ua's movement, with the conviction that the defeats had been caused by disobedience to the leader by the prophets Hepanaia and Matene.
_	They built City Year with the conviction that one person can make a difference.
_	In 2004, the Cardinal Vicar of Rome, Cardinal Camillo Ruini, said “The rather frequent occasions that I had to meet Bishop del Portillo imprinted on my soul the conviction that I found myself in the presence of an exemplary pastor.”
_	The British government was left with the conviction that, in the future, opportunities for arms limitation talks with the Germans should not be lost because of French "intransigence".
_	Core principles include the conviction that every person deserves life's basic necessities.
_	Local tradition cherishes the conviction that the Cloch-Oir itself can be identified with a large stone that once stood against the north wall of St.Macartan's Cathedral and is now housed in the porch.
_	While neither schema has inherent superiority, the technological advantage of Europeans became a resource to disseminate the conviction that underscored their schemas, that non-Europeans could be enslaved.
_	Christian writers whose works clearly reflect the conviction that the Earth is spherical include Saint Bede the Venerable in his "Reckoning of Time", written around AD 723.
_	Reality therapy is very much a therapy of decision (or choice) and change, based upon the conviction that, even though human persons often have let themselves become products of their past's powerful influences, they need not be held forever hostage by those earlier influences.
_	It rested on the conviction that no democracy could take the harsh measures to curb inflation, reassure investors, and quicken economic growth quickly and effectively.
_	The basis of the merger of Tau Beta Pi and Sigma Tau was the conviction that a single, strong honor society would better serve the engineering profession.
_	They offer their first number with fear and trembling, but with the conviction that they are undertaking a work which very much needed doing."
_	The experience of wars in 1962, 1965 and 1971 reinforced the conviction that the Northern Theatre needed to be commanded by a headquarters at Shimla.
_	Social ecology, founded by Bookchin, is based on the conviction that nearly all of humanity's present ecological problems originate in, indeed are mere symptoms of, dysfunctional social arrangements.
_	This was important for the purposes of a U.S. Supreme Court case in 2004, "Leocal v. Ashcroft", where a deportation order was overturned because the conviction that led to the deportation order was a strict liability law, while deportation was only allowed upon conviction if the crime was a "crime of violence" (where violence, or the potential for it, was inherent in the crime itself).
_	"Beliefs include the conviction that there are deep and hidden things about an individual that only diviners, priests, and other qualified persons can unravel.
_	On October 18, 1953, the U.S. State Department issued a bulletin expressing its "deepest sympathy for the families of those who lost their lives" in Qibya as well as the conviction that those responsible "should be brought to account and that effective measures should be taken to prevent such incidents in the future."
_	That same evening Martin Luther comes across one of his parishioners in a drunken stupor with the conviction that he does not need to go to confession anymore because he has bought one of Tetzel's indulgences.
_	Watson continued that the hours spent with him that year "left me with the conviction that in translating such texts, it is not enough merely to bring across the meaning of the Chinese; one must do so in a manner that reads like natural idiomatic English.
_	The constant medical metaphors, the perception of Spain as a gravely injured country, the conviction that the military defeat was just a symptom of more deeper problems, the diagnosis of a progressive fall and the need of its “salvation”.
_	At the book's end, David expresses the conviction that he is happy and thankful, and does not care how long he has to live.
_	Based on the conviction that man could improve and progress through the acquisition of knowledge, Charton applied his considerable efforts disseminating "practical knowledge" to the greatest number, using his great writing talent only to inform and provide moral guidance.
_	She addressed these words to Chapman in a friendly letter: "My dear Carrie, I am sure that I have not lived in vain, we have done our task, and we can leave the world with the conviction that we leave it better than we found it".
_	Thomas Hill and his sons had strong political views which, at that time, were certainly radical, but always with the conviction that reforms had to come by persuasion, and constitutionally, not by violence.
_	His modest family circumstances had very early on led Schunk to the conviction that only above-average hard work and constant pursuit of education could make the prerequisites for social advancement possible.
_	The instructions to centralize the cult sprang from the conviction that the cult in the different country shrines could no longer be reincorporated into the ordinances of a pure faith in God.
_	In the 1930s he joined the Servizio Informazioni Militare, Italy's secret service, and became a Fascist in the conviction that only a totalitarian regime could revolutionise and improve the country.
_	The story takes place at an Internet café, following the lives of a regular cast of characters, including Rudy, the café's manager, who believes in all things Internet, the healing powers of consumption, and the conviction that inner peace lies in having the latest technological gadget.
_	Initially it was the bazaaris who led the opposition under the conviction that it was their income and livelihood which were at stake.
_	According to the official webpage, the cooperation is based on the conviction that there is much to be gained through cost sharing, joint solutions, and joint actions.
_	In 1931 she witnessed the proclamation of the Second Spanish Republic, with the conviction that what happened to her while living in Russia in 1917 was going to happen in her own country.
_	She tried to analyse the refusal to give any political value to what was happening in the suburbs by deconstructing racist implicit images of public speeches (the roots of it might be the conviction that the one who does not speak the language of political representation is necessarily aphasic, childish or even animal).
_	Driven by the conviction that the use of crowds could make the execution of relatively simple tasks more sustainable, Roamler started offering its services within the field marketing segment.
_	These delusions appear to have started in 1832 with the "low fever" and the conviction that she was part of the Trinity, and they continued for the rest of her life.
_	The participating organizations came together with the conviction that a joint action would make them stronger in their struggle.
_	Panic-stricken and half-dead, he returns to England without Richards, but with the conviction that at the end, the moai, the great stone heads, walked across the island in pursuit of him...
_	His policy was guided by the conviction that the power of the states on the periphery of Europe, namely Great Britain and Russia, was increasing, and ought to be diminished.
_	Nevertheless the British will to victory is still bound up with the conviction that our war aims stand on a different plane from those of the enemy, and that victory for our aims will point the way to a new social and international order in Europe".
_	In an opening address, “she expressed the conviction that a strong body of high-principled women musicians might do a great deal to reform public opinion on music and raise the standard of musical politics.”
_	The third movement of the poem is addressed to his sister Dorothy, "my dearest Friend,/ My dear, dear Friend," as a sharer in this vision and in the conviction that "all which we behold is full of blessings".
_	They were both perfectionists... animated by the conviction that the only possible way for advertising to command attention and be remembered was to present each message so distinctively that it would stand out in relief from all others" (Golden, Weihs, and Strunsky, 130).
_	"Hear Hear!", on the other hand, provides a pre-concert preview performance of the evening's featured contemporary work, borne out of the conviction that "nothing beats repeated listening" when it comes to understanding new music.
